Utah statutes.
31A-8-211.   Deposit.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each health maintenance organization authorized in this state shall maintain a deposit with the commissioner under Section 31A-2-206 in an amount equal to the sum of:

(a) $100,000; and

(b)  50% of the greater of:

(i)  $900,000;

(ii)  2% of the annual premium revenues as reported on the most recent annual financial statement filed with the commissioner; or

(iii)  an amount equal to the sum of three months uncovered health care expenditures as reported on the most recent financial statement filed with the commissioner.

(2) (a)  After a hearing the commissioner may exempt a health maintenance organization from the deposit requirement of Subsection (1) if:

(i)  the commissioner determines that the enrollees' interests are adequately protected;

(ii)  the health maintenance organization has been continuously authorized to do business in this state for at least five years; and

(iii)  the health maintenance organization has $5,000,000 surplus in excess of the health maintenance organization's company action level RBC as defined in Subsection 31A-17-601(8)(b).

(b)  The commissioner may rescind an exemption given under Subsection (2)(a).

(3) (a)  Each limited health plan authorized in this state shall maintain a deposit with the commissioner under Section 31A-2-206 in an amount equal to the minimum capital or permanent surplus plus 50% of the greater of:

(i)  .5 times minimum required capital or minimum permanent surplus; or

(ii) (A)  during the first year of operation, 10% of the limited health plan's projected uncovered expenditures for the first year of operation;

(B)  during the second year of operation, 12% of the limited health plan's projected uncovered expenditures for the second year of operation;

(C)  during the third year of operation, 14% of the limited health plan's projected uncovered expenditures for the third year of operation;

(D)  during the fourth year of operation, 18% of the limited health plan's projected uncovered expenditures during the fourth year of operation; or

(E)  during the fifth year of operation, and during all subsequent years, 20% of the limited health plan's projected uncovered expenditures for the previous 12 months.

(b)  Projections of future uncovered expenditures shall be established in a manner that is approved by the commissioner.

(4)  A deposit required by this section may be counted toward the minimum capital or minimum permanent surplus required under Section 31A-8-209.

